Hawaii statutes.
[§514B-55] Developer's public report;
request for hearing by developer. If an effective date for a developer's
public report is not issued within a reasonable time after compliance with
registration requirements, or if the developer is materially grieved by the
form or content of the developer's public report, the developer, in writing,
may request and shall be given a hearing by the commission within a reasonable
time after receipt of the request. [L 2005, c 93, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next